Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; IMPROVE WATER QUALITY IN UPPER TWIN LAKE.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for a grant to the Twin Lake Association for a two-year water-quality improvement project at Upper Twin Lake in Hennepin County. The grant must be used to contract for new and innovative nonchemical, flow-through, water-quality improvement technologies and testing services; necessary infrastructure; selective invasive weed control; carp control; training; and maintenance. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to Twin Lake Association to address increased weed-harvesting needs at Upper Twin Lake in Hennepin County. new text end